Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-306
Health insurance plan; method of claim payment; restrictions.

Beginning January 1, 2027, a health insurance plan, its contractors, and its affiliates shall not restrict the method of claim payment to a health care provider for health care services to a credit, charge, or debit card, or any combination thereof.

Laws 2026, LB967, § 26.
July 18, 2026